Idaho, session 2025, S1070.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 48, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-4806, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-4806. PARENT TECH AWARENESS PROGRAM. (1) The state department of
education shall establish and make available to all Idaho public schools and
private schools serving students in kindergarten through grade 12 an online
parent tech awareness program. Each school district board of trustees and
public charter school board of directors shall offer, without charge, the
online parent tech awareness program established pursuant to this section to
the parents and legal guardians of students in the school district or public
charter school.
(2) The state department of education may develop the online parent
tech awareness program or may contract with a third-party entity for such
development.
(3) The online parent tech awareness program shall enhance parent and
legal guardian awareness of:
(a) The potential dangers inherent in the use of devices with internet
capabilities, including but not limited to cellular phones and comput-
ers;
(b) The nature of online threats;
(c) The mechanisms required to, and the ways in which children, par-
ticipate and engage in online activity that is a threat or risk to their
safety; and
(d) Best practices and strategies for parents and legal guardians to
protect students from threats and exploitation on the internet and on
social media.
(4) At the beginning of each school year, or at the enrollment period
for new students, each school district and public charter school shall pro-
vide parents and legal guardians of students in the school district or public
charter school with information regarding the online parent tech awareness
program, including information on how to access the program. Each school
district and public charter school shall also require the parents and legal
guardians of the students to sign a form developed by the state department of
education acknowledging receipt of the information provided in this subsec-
tion.


(5) The form provided for in subsection (4) of this section shall be
signed by the parent or legal guardian of the student and returned to the
school district or public charter school.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.